Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 13.2. Standards of Quality.
The 2014 amendment by c. 84, in the ninth paragraph of subsection C, substituted “a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “the General Education Development (GED) certificate”; and inserted “or an adult secondary education program,” and “or a high school equivalency certificate.”

The 2014 amendments by cc. 585 and 622 are identical, and deleted the first three sentences in the second paragraph of subsection C, which read “In prescribing such Standards of Learning assessments, the Board shall provide local school boards the option of administering tests for United States History to 1877, United States History: 1877 to the Present, and Civics and Economics. The last administration of the cumulative grade eight history test will be during the 2007-2008 academic school year. Beginning with the 2008-2009 academic year, all school divisions shall administer the United States History to 1877, United States History: 1877 to the Present, and Civics and Economics tests”; in the fourth paragraph of subsection C substituted “assessments” for “tests,” “including the completion of the alternative assessments implemented by each local school board” for “as determined by the Board,” and deleted “Standards of Learning” following “These” and “but need not be limited to” following “shall include”; added the fifth and sixth paragraphs of subsection C; in the eighth paragraph of subsection C substituted “other” for “alternative” and redesignated clauses (a)-(c) as (A)-(C); in subsection E inserted “including computer-adaptive Standards of Learning assessments”; and in subsection F inserted “alternative assessments,” deleted “all” following “assessments to,” “for grade levels and courses identified by the Board of Education” preceding “which may include” and “and alternative assessment instruments” following “teacher-made tests,” substituted “assessments, the local school board’s alternative assessments” for “Assessments,” and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 145 inserted “and may be integrated to include multiple subject areas” at the end of the fourth paragraph in subsection C.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 149 and 558 are identical, and in subsection C, deleted “(i) in consultation with the chairpersons of the eight regional superintendents’ study groups, establish a timetable for administering the Standards of Learning assessments to ensure genuine end-of-course and end-of-grade testing and (ii)” following “The Board shall” in the third sentence, and added the fourth sentence.

The 2015 amendment by c. 322 added the tenth paragraph in subsection C.

The 2015 amendment by c. 323 in the fifth paragraph of subsection C, substituted “writing, and mathematics in grade eight” for “writing, mathematics, and science in grade eight” in clause (d), added clause (e) and redesignated former clause (e) as clause (f).

The 2015 amendment by c. 566 added the second, third, fourth and fifth sentences in the third paragraph of subsection A and inserted “regardless of accreditation frequency” in the first sentence of the third paragraph of subsection F.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 386, in the third paragraph of subsection A, substituted “The Board shall” for “However, the Board may” in the second sentence, substituted “shall accredit” for “may accredit” in the fourth sentence, rewrote the fifth sentence, which read “The Board shall review the accreditation status of any school that (i) in any individual year within the triennial review period would have failed to achieve full accreditation or (ii) in the previous year has had an adjustment of its boundaries by a school board pursuant to subdivision 4 of § 22.1-79 that affects at least 10 percent of the student population of the school” and added the last two sentences; in the third paragraph of subsection A, substituted “shall report” for “shall review” in the second sentence; in the fourth paragraph of subsection A, substituted “determines” for “has obtained evidence” and inserted “or other division-level action or inaction” in the first sentence, substituted “to the Board for approval” for “approval by the Board” in the second sentence and added the third sentence; in subsection B, substituted “report to the Board on the accreditation status of all school divisions and schools” for “identify to the Board those school divisions and schools that exceed or do not meet the approved criteria” in the third sentence and “Such report” for “Such identification” in the fourth sentence.

The 2016 amendment by c. 387 added the last paragraph in subsection C.

The 2016 amendment by c. 502 inserted the ninth paragraph in subsection C.

The 2016 amendment by c. 522 inserted the fifth paragraph in subsection C.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 720 and 750 are identical, and deleted “course and credit” preceding “requirements for graduation from high school” near the end of the first paragraph in subsection A; and deleted “verified” preceding “credit” in the second paragraph of subsection C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 328, in subsection A, deleted “but not be limited to” preceding “student outcome measures” in the first paragraph, and added the third paragraph.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 10 of §

2.2-3705.3

” for “subdivision 11
of §

2.2-3705.3

” in the first sentence of the third paragraph in subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 585, in subsection A, in the fifth paragraph, deleted the third sentence, which read: “Within the time specified by the Board of Education, each school board shall submit corrective action plans for any schools within its school division that have been designated as not meeting the standards as approved by the Board”; inserted the sixth and seventh paragraphs; in the eighth paragraph, substituted “Board determines through its review” for “Board of Education determines through the school academic,” substituted “meet the standards established by the Board” for “achieve full accreditation status” or similar language three times and inserted “enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Board and shall subsequently”; and deleted the ninth paragraph, which read: “With such funds as are appropriated or otherwise received for this purpose, the Board shall adopt and implement an academic review process, to be conducted by the Department of Education, to assist schools that are accredited with warning. The Department shall forward a report of each academic review to the relevant local school board, and such school board shall report the results of such academic review and the required annual progress reports in public session. The local school board shall implement any actions identified through the academic review and utilize them for improvement planning.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 443 and 444, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted “of Education” and similar language following “Board” and “Department” throughout the section; in subsection A, inserted clause designations, and substituted “the Commonwealth” for “Virginia”; rewrote subsection B and C; and in subsection F, substituted “assessment data” for “assessment scores and averages for each year” and “Department’s” for “Department of Education.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in subsections B and G, deleted “of Public Instruction” following “Superintendent” throughout; deleted the last five sentences in subsection C in the eleventh paragraph, which read: “An annual justification that includes evidence that the student meets the participation criteria defined by the Department shall be provided for each student considered for the Virginia Grade Level Alternative. Each Individual Education Program team shall review such justification and make the final determination as to whether or not the Virginia Grade Level Alternative is appropriate for the student. The superintendent and the school board chairman shall certify to the Board, as a part of certifying compliance with the Standards of Quality, that there is a justification in the Individual Education Program for every student who takes the Virginia Grade Level Alternative. Compliance with this requirement shall be monitored as a part of the special education monitoring process conducted by the Department. The Board shall report to the Governor and General Assembly in its annual reports pursuant to § 22.1-18 any school division that is not in compliance with this requirement”; in subsection F, deleted “the Stanford Achievement Test Series, Ninth Edition (Stanford Nine) assessment, if administered” in the first paragraph and deleted the second paragraph, which read: “The Board shall not require administration of the Stanford Achievement Test Series, Ninth Edition (Stanford Nine) assessment, except as may be selected to facilitate compliance with the requirements for home instruction pursuant to § 22.1-254.1”; and made a stylistic change.